Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-1603
Engineering services; duties of county board; estimate of cost.

Upon the filing of such petition in the office of the county board wherein the greater portion of the area of the proposed district is located, such county board shall engage the professional engineers, who have furnished engineering to the resident petitioners, who shall prepare an estimate of the cost of paving or improving certain road or roads within the district and file such estimate with the county board.

Laws 1957, c. 155, art. III, § 3, p. 525;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 60.